Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1005.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
Section 1. Title 16, chapter 6, article 1.2, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-919, to
read:
16-919. Foreign contributions prohibited; ballot
measures; certification; definition
A. A FOREIGN [CORPORATION OR PERSON] [NATIONAL] SHALL
NOT GIVE AND A PERSON, ENTITY OR COMMITTEE SHALL NOT ACCEPT OR
USE MONIES OR IN-KIND GOODS OR SERVICES THAT ARE CONTRIBUTED
BY A FOREIGN [CORPORATION OR PERSON OR A FOREIGN
NONGOVERNMENTAL SOURCE] [NATIONAL] TO INFLUENCE THE OUTCOME OF
AN ELECTION ON A BALLOT MEASURE, QUESTION, ISSUE OR
PROPOSITION, INCLUDING AN INITIATIVE OR REFERENDUM.
B. A PERSON, ENTITY OR COMMITTEE THAT IS REQUIRED TO
FILE CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 16-926 SHALL
CERTIFY UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY IN THOSE REPORTS THAT THE
PERSON, ENTITY OR COMMITTEE HAS NOT ACCEPTED OR USED MONIES OR
IN-KIND GOODS OR SERVICES IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION A OF THIS
SECTION.

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1005
C. FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED SOVEREIGN TRIBAL NATIONS ARE
EXEMPT FROM THIS SECTION.
[D. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, "FOREIGN
NATIONAL" MEANS:
1. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF
THE UNITED STATES OR WHO IS NOT LAWFULLY ADMITTED FOR
PERMANENT RESIDENCE IN THE UNITED STATES,
2. A FOREIGN GOVERNMENT OR FOREIGN POLITICAL PARTY.
3. A PARTNERSHIP, ASSOCIATION, CORPORATION,
ORGANIZATION OR OTHER COMBINATION OF PERSONS THAT IS ORGANIZED
UNDER THE LAWS OF OR HAVING ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IN
A COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES.]
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona.
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
MARK FINCHEM
SCR1005FloorFINCHEM.docx
02/24/2026
10:38 PM
C: MR
130PBPRRF
-2-